src/fst/morphology/affixes/verb_middle_affixes.lexc
LEXICON Filter-SBJ-DO-Conditions

! No 1SG > 1SG ("I saw me") or 1SG > 1PL ("I saw us").
@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.OBJECTNUMBER.SG@@U.OBJECTPERSON.2@
    Filter-SBJ-IO;
@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.OBJECTNUMBER.SG@@U.OBJECTPERSON.3@
    Filter-SBJ-IO;
@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.OBJECTNUMBER.SG@@U.OBJECTPERSON.4@
    Filter-SBJ-IO;
@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.OBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.OBJECTPERSON.2@
    Filter-SBJ-IO;
@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.OBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.OBJECTPERSON.3@
    Filter-SBJ-IO;
@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.OBJECTPERSON.AREAL@
    Filter-SBJ-IO;
@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.OBJECTPERSON.INDEF@
    Filter-SBJ-IO;

! No 2SG > 2SG ("you saw you") or 2SG > 2PL ("you saw you guys").
@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.OBJECTNUMBER.SG@@U.OBJECTPERSON.1@
    Filter-SBJ-IO;
@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.OBJECTNUMBER.SG@@U.OBJECTPERSON.3@
    Filter-SBJ-IO;
@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.OBJECTNUMBER.SG@@U.OBJECTPERSON.4@
    Filter-SBJ-IO;
@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.OBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.OBJECTPERSON.1@
    Filter-SBJ-IO;
@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.OBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.OBJECTPERSON.3@
    Filter-SBJ-IO;
@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.OBJECTPERSON.AREAL@
    Filter-SBJ-IO;
@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.OBJECTPERSON.INDEF@
    Filter-SBJ-IO;

! No 1PL > 1SG ("we saw me") or 1PL > 1PL ("we saw us").
@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.OBJECTNUMBER.SG@@U.OBJECTPERSON.2@
    Filter-SBJ-IO;
@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.OBJECTNUMBER.SG@@U.OBJECTPERSON.3@
    Filter-SBJ-IO;
@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.OBJECTNUMBER.SG@@U.OBJECTPERSON.4@
    Filter-SBJ-IO;
@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.OBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.OBJECTPERSON.2@
    Filter-SBJ-IO;
@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.OBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.OBJECTPERSON.3@
    Filter-SBJ-IO;
@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.OBJECTPERSON.AREAL@
    Filter-SBJ-IO;
@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.OBJECTPERSON.INDEF@
    Filter-SBJ-IO;

! No 2PL > 2SG ("you guys saw you") or 2PL > 2PL ("you guys saw you guys").
@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.OBJECTNUMBER.SG@@U.OBJECTPERSON.1@
    Filter-SBJ-IO;
@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.OBJECTNUMBER.SG@@U.OBJECTPERSON.3@
    Filter-SBJ-IO;
@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.OBJECTNUMBER.SG@@U.OBJECTPERSON.4@
    Filter-SBJ-IO;
@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.OBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.OBJECTPERSON.1@
    Filter-SBJ-IO;
@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.OBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.OBJECTPERSON.3@
    Filter-SBJ-IO;
@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.OBJECTPERSON.AREAL@
    Filter-SBJ-IO;
@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.OBJECTPERSON.INDEF@
    Filter-SBJ-IO;

! All 3SG/3PL/4 forms are fine, since combinations of subjects and direct
! objects in these persons that have special morphological realizations
! are handled elsewhere above.
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@                 Filter-SBJ-IO;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@                 Filter-SBJ-IO;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@                 Filter-SBJ-IO;

! All (non-3/4) reflexive and reciprocal forms are fine. (3SG/3PL/4 forms are
! handled above)
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.OBJECTPERSON.REFL@                Filter-SBJ-IO;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.OBJECTPERSON.REFL@                Filter-SBJ-IO;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.OBJECTPERSON.RECIP@               Filter-SBJ-IO;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.OBJECTPERSON.RECIP@               Filter-SBJ-IO;


LEXICON Filter-SBJ-IO

@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@                                #;
@U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE@                                  #;
@U.VALENCE.OBLIQUEOBJECT@                               Filter-SBJ-IO-Checks;
@U.VALENCE.DITRANSITIVE@                                Filter-SBJ-IO-Checks;

LEXICON Filter-SBJ-IO-Checks

! Only provide paths out of this lexicon for ditransitive forms whose subject-
! oblique object combinations are semantically plausible.

! No 1SG > 1SG ("I saw me") or 1SG > 1PL ("I saw us").
@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.OBLIQUENUMBER.SG@@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.2@
    Filter-DO-IO;
@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.OBLIQUENUMBER.SG@@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.3@
    Filter-DO-IO;
@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.OBLIQUENUMBER.SG@@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.4@
    Filter-DO-IO;
@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.OBLIQUENUMBER.PL@@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.2@
    Filter-DO-IO;
@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.OBLIQUENUMBER.PL@@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.3@
    Filter-DO-IO;
@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.AREAL@
    Filter-DO-IO;

! No 2SG > 2SG ("you saw you") or 2SG > 2PL ("you saw you guys").
@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.OBLIQUENUMBER.SG@@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.1@
    Filter-DO-IO;
@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.OBLIQUENUMBER.SG@@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.3@
    Filter-DO-IO;
@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.OBLIQUENUMBER.SG@@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.4@
    Filter-DO-IO;
@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.OBLIQUENUMBER.PL@@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.1@
    Filter-DO-IO;
@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.OBLIQUENUMBER.PL@@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.3@
    Filter-DO-IO;
@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.AREAL@
    Filter-DO-IO;

! No 1PL > 1SG ("we saw me") or 1PL > 1PL ("we saw us").
@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.OBLIQUENUMBER.SG@@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.2@
    Filter-DO-IO;
@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.OBLIQUENUMBER.SG@@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.3@
    Filter-DO-IO;
@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.OBLIQUENUMBER.SG@@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.4@
    Filter-DO-IO;
@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.OBLIQUENUMBER.PL@@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.2@
    Filter-DO-IO;
@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.OBLIQUENUMBER.PL@@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.3@
    Filter-DO-IO;
@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.AREAL@
    Filter-DO-IO;

! No 2PL > 2SG ("you guys saw you") or 2PL > 2PL ("you guys saw you guys").
@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.OBLIQUENUMBER.SG@@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.1@
    Filter-DO-IO;
@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.OBLIQUENUMBER.SG@@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.3@
    Filter-DO-IO;
@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.OBLIQUENUMBER.SG@@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.4@
    Filter-DO-IO;
@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.OBLIQUENUMBER.PL@@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.1@
    Filter-DO-IO;
@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.OBLIQUENUMBER.PL@@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.3@
    Filter-DO-IO;
@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.AREAL@
    Filter-DO-IO;

! All 3SG/3PL/4 forms are fine, since combinations of subjects and oblique
! objects in these persons that have special morphological realizations are
! handled elsewhere above.
@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@                 Filter-DO-IO;
@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@@U.SUBJECTPERSON.4@                 Filter-DO-IO;
@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@                 Filter-DO-IO;

! All (non-3/4) reflexive and reciprocal forms are fine at this point.
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.REFL@               Filter-DO-IO;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.REFL@               Filter-DO-IO;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.RECIP@              Filter-DO-IO;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.RECIP@              Filter-DO-IO;


LEXICON Filter-DO-IO

@U.VALENCE.OBLIQUEOBJECT@                               #;
@U.VALENCE.DITRANSITIVE@                                Filter-DO-IO-Checks;

LEXICON Filter-DO-IO-Checks

@U.OBJECTPERSON.REFL@                                   Filter-DO-IO-Refl;
@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.REFL@                                  Filter-DO-IO-Refl;
@U.OBJECTPERSON.RECIP@                                  Filter-DO-IO-Recip;
@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.RECIP@                                 Filter-DO-IO-Recip;
@D.OBJECTPERSON.REFL@@D.OBLIQUEPERSON.REFL@@D.OBJECTPERSON.RECIP@@D.OBLIQUEPERSON.RECIP@       Filter-DO-IO-Other;

LEXICON Filter-DO-IO-Refl

! Make sure that at most one reflexive or reciprocal form appears as a direct
! object or indirect object (i.e., no DObj.REFL/RECIP-IObj.REFL/RECIP
! combinations)
!
! TODO: In theory, there might be contexts in which REFL-RECIP (e.g., 'they
! fed themselves to each other') and RECIP-REFL (e.g., 'they fed each other
! to themselves') might be plausible. For now, we exclude those forms from
! being produced/accepted, since they tend to be semantically odd for most
! ditransitive verbs.
@U.OBJECTPERSON.REFL@@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.1@                    #;
@U.OBJECTPERSON.REFL@@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.2@                    #;
@U.OBJECTPERSON.REFL@@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.3@                    #;
@U.OBJECTPERSON.REFL@@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.4@                    #;
@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.REFL@@U.OBJECTPERSON.1@                    #;
@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.REFL@@U.OBJECTPERSON.2@                    #;
@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.REFL@@U.OBJECTPERSON.3@                    #;
@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.REFL@@U.OBJECTPERSON.4@                    #;

LEXICON Filter-DO-IO-Recip

@U.OBJECTPERSON.RECIP@@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.1@                   #;
@U.OBJECTPERSON.RECIP@@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.2@                   #;
@U.OBJECTPERSON.RECIP@@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.3@                   #;
@U.OBJECTPERSON.RECIP@@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.4@                   #;
@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.RECIP@@U.OBJECTPERSON.1@                   #;
@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.RECIP@@U.OBJECTPERSON.2@                   #;
@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.RECIP@@U.OBJECTPERSON.3@                   #;
@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.RECIP@@U.OBJECTPERSON.4@                   #;
